New Mexico, session 2026, SB301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Four million dollars ($4,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the children, youth and families department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the foster engagement adaptability diversity initiative program to support culturally competent training services for foster parents caring for an Indian child pursuant to the Indian Family Protection Act and federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund.